Washington statutes.
RCW 16.70.050

Violations—Penalty.

Any person violating or refusing or neglecting to obey the order or directive issued by the secretary pursuant to the authority granted under this action [act] or the rules and regulations promulgated by the board hereunder shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 1971 c 72 s 5.]